Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2791.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 8, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-917, to read: START_STATUTE36-917. Cell-cultured protein; prohibition; violation; classification; definition A. A person may not offer for sale or sell cell-cultured protein for human consumption in this state. B. A person who violates this section is guilty of a class 5 felony. C. For the purposes of this section, "cell-cultured protein" means a food product derived from harvesting animal cells and artificially replicating those cells in a growth medium to produce tissue. END_STATUTE